Utah statutes.
4-17-8.   Noxious weeds -- Failure to control after notice a nuisance -- Notice and hearing -- Control at county expense -- Owner liable for county costs -- Charges lien against property.

(1)  If the owner or person in possession of the property fails to take action to control or prevent the spread of noxious weeds within five working days after the property is declared a public nuisance, the county may, after reasonable notification, enter the property, without the consent of the owner or the person in possession, and perform any work necessary, consistent with sound weed prevention and control practices, to control the weeds.

(2)  Any expense incurred by the county in controlling the noxious weeds is paid by the property owner of record or the person in possession of the property, as the case may be, within 90 days after receipt of the charges incurred by the county.  If not paid within 90 days after notice of the charges, the charges become a lien against the property and are collectible by the county treasurer at the time general property taxes are collected.

